Washington statutes.
RCW 36.87.130

Vacation of roads abutting bodies of water prohibited unless for public purposes or industrial use.

No county shall vacate a county road or part thereof which abuts on a body of salt or fresh water unless the purpose of the vacation is to enable any public authority to acquire the vacated property for port purposes, boat moorage or launching sites, or for park, viewpoint, recreational, educational or other public purposes, or unless the property is zoned for industrial uses.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 185 s 7; (2020 c 300 s 1 expired December 31, 2023).]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2020 c 300 s 1: "Section 1 of this act expires December 31, 2023." [ 2020 c 300 s 2.]